Utah statutes.
35A-4-105.   Department may be represented by attorneys in actions.

(1)  In any civil action to enforce the provisions of this chapter the department may be represented by any qualified attorney who is employed by the department and is designated by it for this purpose, or at the department's request by the attorney general, or if the action is brought in the courts of any other state by any attorney qualified to appear in the courts of that state.

(2)  All criminal actions for violation of any provision of this chapter, or of any rules or regulations issued pursuant thereto, shall be prosecuted by the attorney general of the state; or, at his request and under his direction, by the prosecuting attorney of any county in which the employing unit has a place of business or the violator resides.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 240, 1996 General Session

